Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3520
Applicability of act.

(a) The Nebraska Uniform Custodial Trust Act applies to a transfer or declaration creating a custodial trust that refers to the act if, at the time of the transfer or declaration, the transferor, beneficiary, or custodial trustee is a resident of or has its principal place of business in this state or custodial trust property is located in this state. The custodial trust remains subject to the act despite a later change in residence or principal place of business of the transferor, beneficiary, or custodial trustee, or removal of the custodial trust property from this state.

(b) A transfer made pursuant to an act of another state substantially similar to the Nebraska Uniform Custodial Trust Act is governed by the law of that state and may be enforced in this state.

Laws 1997, LB 51, § 20.